Arkansas statutes. Title 22 Public Property
Chapter 3 Public Buildings and Other Facilities
22-3-1401. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and cited as the “State Agencies Facilities Acquisition Act of 1991”.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 1.

22-3-1402. Construction.

(a)

This subchapter shall be construed liberally.

(b)

The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, and thing shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, and things.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, §§ 4, 15, 16; 1993, No. 829, § 1; 1999, No. 1182, § 1.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment deleted former (c).

22-3-1403. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Agency” or “state agency” means any agency, board, office, commission, department, division, or institution of the State of Arkansas;

(2)

“Authority” means the Arkansas Development Finance Authority created pursuant to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority Act, §15-5-101 et seq., §§15-5-201 —15-5-211,15-5-213, and15-5-301 —15-5-316;

(3)

“Bonds” or “revenue bonds” means any bonds, notes, debentures, interim certificates, grant and revenue anticipation notes, interest in a lease, lease certificates of participation, or evidences of indebtedness, whether or not the interest on them is subject to federal income taxation; and

(4)

“Construct” means to acquire, construct, reconstruct, remodel, install, and equip any lands, buildings, structures, improvements, or other property, real, personal, or mixed, useful in connection therewith and to make other necessary expenditures in connection therewith by such methods and in such manner as the Building Authority Division shall determine to be necessary or desirable to accomplish the powers, purposes, and authority set forth in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 2; 1999, No. 1182, § 2; 2007, No. 186, § 10; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 76; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 76; 2019, No. 910, § 6209.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 repealed (4).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (4).

22-3-1404. Powers.

In addition to the purposes, powers, and authority set forth elsewhere in this subchapter or in other laws, the Building Authority Division may:

(1)

Acquire, construct, and equip buildings or by purchase, exchange, barter, gift, long-term lease, or other means, buildings and facilities to house state agencies;

(2)

Exercise the power of eminent domain within Pulaski County only for the purpose of acquiring buildings and facilities and to otherwise carry out the purposes and intent of this subchapter, with such power to be exercised in the manner provided in §22-2-109;

(3)

Provide for the housing of state agencies in the buildings and facilities so acquired or constructed to the extent that space and facilities are available for such purpose, under such terms and conditions, and for such rentals and charges, as the division determines;

(4)

Acquire, construct, or cause to be constructed parking facilities, storage facilities, warehouses, garages, and other ancillary and related facilities to serve the facility;

(5)

Purchase, lease, or rent and receive bequests or donations of or otherwise acquire, sell, trade, or barter any property, real, personal, or mixed, and convert such property into money or other property;

(6)

Contract and be contracted with;

(7)

Apply for, receive, accept, and use any moneys and property from the United States Government, any agency, state, governmental body, political subdivision, public or private organization or corporation of any nature, or any individual; and

(8)

Take such other actions not inconsistent with law as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the powers, purposes, and authority as set forth in this section in accordance with the policies promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 3; 1999, No. 1182, § 3; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 48; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 48; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 77; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 77; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6210, 6211.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment rewrote (1); inserted “within Pulaski County only” in (2); in (3), substituted “Provide” for “Arrange” and inserted “so acquired or constructed”; inserted “storage facilities, warehouses, garages, and other ancillary and related facilities” in (4); and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration may” for “Arkansas Building Authority is hereby authorized and empowered to” in the introductory language; substituted “the division determines” for “Arkansas Building Authority may determine” in (a)(3); and rewrote (a)(8).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” from the end of (8).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language; and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (8).

22-3-1405. Duties.

In addition to the purposes, powers, and authority set forth elsewhere in this subchapter or in other laws, in connection with the construction and equipping of buildings and facilities in Little Rock, Arkansas, to house state agencies, the Building Authority Division may:

(1)

Obtain the necessary funds for accomplishing the purposes set forth in this subchapter from any source or sources, including without limitation the proceeds of revenue bonds or lease financings as authorized herein, and other funds as may be appropriated or may be available therefor;

(2)

Contract and be contracted with;

(3)

Invest and reinvest any of the proceeds of such revenue bonds as provided in such authorizing resolution or trust indenture, hereinafter authorized; and

(4)

Take such other actions not inconsistent with law as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the powers, purposes, and authority set forth herein, in accordance with the policies promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services as authorized by law.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 3; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 49; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 49; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 2, § 78; 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), No. 3, § 78; 2019, No. 910, §§ 6212, 6213.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration may” for “Arkansas Building Authority is hereby authorized to” in the introductory language; and substituted “policies promulgated by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration with the advice of the Building Authority Council” for “duly promulgated policies of the Arkansas Building Authority Council” in
(4).

The 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 2 and 3 deleted “with the advice of the Building Authority Council” following “Administration” in (4).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language; and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Transformation and Shared Services” for “Director of the Department of Finance and Administration” in (4).

22-3-1406. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning limits on total cost of an acquisition, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1182, § 4. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 4.

22-3-1407. Revenue bonds.

(a)

Pursuant to the intention of the General Assembly expressed in §15-5-303, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, in cooperation with the Building Authority Division, is hereby authorized and empowered to issue revenue bonds at one (1) time or from time to time, and to use the proceeds thereof for defraying the costs of accomplishing all or part of the powers, purposes, and authorities set forth in this subchapter and all expenses incidental thereto, including, without limitation, expenses for the operation and maintenance of such facilities pending completion of the construction, repair, remodeling, or renovation, paying the expenses of authorizing and issuing the bonds, establishing a debt service reserve to secure the payment of the bonds, if the Arkansas Development Finance Authority deems such desirable, and making provision for the payment of debt service on the bonds, including fees of trustees and paying agents, until revenues for the payment thereof are available.

(b)

The bonds outstanding under this subchapter may be in such principal amount as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and the division shall determine to be necessary for the accomplishment of the purposes of this subchapter.

(c)

The bonds shall be authorized, shall be sold by such means, shall bear such rate or rates of interest, and shall be executed and delivered in such manner as the Arkansas Development Finance Authority may determine pursuant to the provisions of §15-5-301 et seq.

(d)(1)

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority is authorized to enter into such authorizing resolutions and trust indentures as it deems necessary to secure the revenue bonds.

(2)

No member of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall be personally liable on the bonds.

(e)

Nothing in the provisions of this subchapter shall be deemed to remove, modify, or amend §15-5-303.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, §§ 5, 6; 1993, No. 829, § 2; 1999, No. 1182, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 6214.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment inserted “construction” in (a); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a) and (b).

22-3-1408. Required statement on bond — Lien and pledge to secure bonds.

(a)

It shall be plainly stated on the face of each bond that it has been issued under the provisions of this subchapter, that the bonds shall be obligations only of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, that in no event shall they constitute indebtedness for which the faith and credit of the State of Arkansas or any of its revenues, within the meaning of Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 20, are pledged.

(b)(1)

The principal of, premiums, if any, interest on, and trustees' and paying agents' fees in connection with the bonds shall be secured by a lien on and pledge of and shall be payable from the pledged revenues defined in this section.

(2)

The authorizing resolution or trust indenture shall set forth details of the nature and extent of the lien and pledge, including provisions for the use of surplus revenues, if any, for any other lawful purposes.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 6.

22-3-1409. Pledge of revenues to secure bonds.

(a)

The principal of, premiums, if any, interest on, and trustees' and paying agents' fees in connection with all bonds issued under this subchapter shall be secured solely by a lien on and pledge of the gross revenues derived from the leasing or renting to state agencies or other tenants of space in the buildings and facilities acquired pursuant to this subchapter, and the pledging of such revenues, the pledged revenues, is hereby authorized.

(b)

All pledged revenues are hereby specifically declared to be cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated and to be used solely as provided and authorized in this subchapter.

(c)

Commencing the first day of the month succeeding the issuance of the bonds hereunder and so long as any bonds are outstanding hereunder, the pledged revenues shall not be deposited into the State Treasury and shall not be subject to legislative appropriation but, as and when received by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority or by any other state agency, as the case may be, shall be deposited into a bank or banks selected by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to the credit of funds designated the “State Agencies Facilities Revenue Bond Fund”, with appropriate identification for separate issues or series.

(d)

So long as any bonds are outstanding hereunder, all moneys in any bond fund shall be used solely for the payment of the principal of, premiums, if any, interest on, and trustees' and paying agents' fees in connection with the bonds, with the maintenance of necessary funds and reserves, except that the authorizing resolution or trust indenture may provide for the withdrawal, for other purposes, of surplus moneys, as defined in the authorizing resolution or trust indenture.

(e)

Nothing in this section is intended to prohibit the Arkansas Development Finance Authority from investing moneys received hereunder, as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 7.

22-3-1410. Contract between Arkansas Development Finance Authority and holders and owners of bonds.

(a)

Any authorizing resolution and trust indenture shall, together with this subchapter, constitute a contract between the Arkansas Development Finance Authority and the holders and registered owners of the bonds, which contract, and all covenants, agreements, and obligations therein, shall be promptly performed in strict compliance with the terms and provisions of such contract, and the covenants, agreements, and obligations of the Building Authority Division may be enforced by mandamus or other appropriate proceedings at law or in equity.

(b)

In this regard, in addition to other provisions referred to in this subchapter, the division is hereby expressly authorized to include in any authorizing resolution or trust indenture assurance that, to the fullest extent possible, it will always charge, impose, and collect sufficient rentals and other revenue to meet, as due, all debt service requirements, maintain reserves at proper levels, and otherwise comply with any provisions of authorizing resolutions or trust indentures concerning revenues and bonds.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 8; 2019, No. 910, § 6215.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a) and (b).

22-3-1411. Bonds exempt from tax.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter, and the interest thereon, shall be exempt from all state, county, and municipal taxes, and the exemption shall include income, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 9.

22-3-1412. Deposit of bond proceeds.

(a)

The Arkansas Development Finance Authority shall include necessary provisions in the authorizing resolution or trust indenture to provide for the deposit of the proceeds of the bonds pursuant to the provisions of §15-5-209.

(b)

The authority may create and establish one (1) or more special funds in such depositories and make such investment as it may designate to provide for the construction, secure the bonds, establish reserves, and fund other necessary functions or activities authorized by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 10.

22-3-1413. Refunding bonds.

(a)

Bonds may be issued for the purpose of refunding any bonds issued under this subchapter.

(b)

Refunding bonds may be issued by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority pursuant to the provisions of §15-5-314.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 11.

22-3-1414. Bondholder rights.

This subchapter shall not create any right in any bondholder for bonds issued pursuant to this subchapter, and no right of such bondholders shall arise under it, until bonds authorized by this subchapter, of the initial issue or series, shall have been sold and delivered by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 14.

22-3-1415. Supervision and management of buildings and facilities.

(a)

The Building Authority Division may supervise and manage buildings and other facilities constructed pursuant to the authority granted in this subchapter and to manage, maintain, and repair those buildings and facilities to provide rental space to be made available for the housing of state agencies, departments, boards, commissions, and institutions, or other tenants at such rental rates as deemed necessary:

(1)

To provide sufficient funds to enable the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to meet, when due, the payment of the principal of, interest on, and trustees' and paying agents' fees in connection with all bonds issued under this subchapter;

(2)

To enable the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to establish and maintain such reserves and other financial obligations in regard to the bonds issued under the provisions of this subchapter, as shall be set forth in any authorizing resolution or trust indenture utilized for that purpose; and

(3)

To pay the costs of utilities, insurance, janitorial supplies and services, building maintenance, upkeep, repair, and remodeling as deemed necessary, including the accumulation of reserves deemed necessary for such purposes as authorized under the provisions of this subchapter, and, in connection therewith, the division may establish one (1) or more accounts in one (1) or more banks authorized to do business in this state to accomplish those purposes.

(b)

The division may hire legal counsel of its choice to assist in the administration of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 13; 1995, No. 1229, § 2; 1999, No. 1182, § 6; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 50; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 50; 2019, No. 910, § 6216.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment substituted “constructed” for “acquired” in (a); and made stylistic changes.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “The Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration may” for “Arkansas Building Authority is hereby authorized to” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “the division” for “Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(3); and substituted “The division may” for “Arkansas Building Authority is hereby authorized to” in (b).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in the introductory language of (a).

22-3-1416. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning liability, was repealed by identical Acts 2016 (3rd Ex. Sess.), Nos. 2 and 3, §
79. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 1173, § 12.

Subchapter 15

— Capitol Building Parking Facility

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 1339, § 9: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 1999, is essential to the operation of the state government and that in the event of an extension of the regular session, the delay of this act beyond July 1, 1999, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental programs, as well as the public. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2001, No. 736, § 4: July 1, 2001. The emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-third General Assembly that the effectiveness of this act on July 1, 2001, is essential to the operation of the state government and that in the event of an extension of the regular session, the delay of this act beyond July 1, 2001, could work irreparable harm upon the proper administration of essential governmental programs, contrary to the public interest. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2001.”

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 153: July 1, 2015. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Arkansas Building Authority, the Arkansas Science and Technology Authority, the Department of Rural Services, and the Division of Land Surveys of the Arkansas Agriculture Department are inefficiently structured; that this inefficient structuring causes an excessive and unnecessary cost to the taxpayers of the this state; and that this act is essential to alleviating that financial burden. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2015.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

22-3-1501. Intent.

The Building Authority Division shall provide adequate facilities for those agencies located in the Capitol Mall area. The services provided by these agencies are varied. Parking spaces for these tenants have not kept up with current growth, thereby diminishing effective services provided by these agencies. The public access to the Capitol Mall area has been diminished by the lack of adequate parking. The construction of a parking deck facility, surface parking, and street improvements will help to alleviate such diminished services and lack of access.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1339, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6217.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-3-1502. Building Authority Division to build and maintain parking facilities.

(a)(1)

Any other provision of law to the contrary notwithstanding, the Building Authority Division is hereby authorized to construct, manage, and maintain parking deck facilities, surface parking, and street improvements, called in this subchapter the “parking facilities”, in the area described in §22-3-302(a).

(2)(A)

The division shall not be responsible for maintaining or assigning parking spaces designated for use by constitutional officers or the General Assembly.

(B)

Provided, however, that if parking spaces in the parking facilities described in this subchapter are to be used by constitutional officers or the General Assembly, the charges for the parking spaces shall be on the same terms accorded to other state agencies, employees, and the public.

(b)

In connection with management of parking facilities, the division may contract with private persons for management services in the manner and for periods of time as the division shall determine to be necessary for the satisfactory operation thereof.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1339, § 2; 2001, No. 736, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 6218.

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1).

22-3-1503. Parking rules.

The Building Authority Division shall develop parking rules which will maintain equitable parking among the state agency tenants in the area described in §22-3-1501 and for the public and may establish reasonable rental or other charges for parking therein. The State Capitol Police shall provide the necessary traffic patrols and policing of the parking facility.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1339, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2361; 2019, No. 910, § 6219.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulation” in the section heading; and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in the first sentence.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-3-1504. Utility easement.

The Building Authority Division, on behalf of the State of Arkansas, is hereby granted an easement or license over the State Capitol Building, the various buildings on the State Capitol grounds, and the State Capitol grounds for the purpose of installing or relocating utilities, connecting the facility to an existing structure, and such other purposes as are necessary and consistent with this project as authorized by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1339, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 6220.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

22-3-1505. Funding.

(a)(1)

The Building Authority Division is authorized and empowered to obtain the necessary funds for accomplishing its powers, purposes, and authority from any source or sources necessary and consistent with this subchapter, including without limitation contracting with the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to provide for the issuance of bonds by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority in accordance with the State Agencies Facilities Acquisition Act of 1991, §22-3-1401 et seq.

(2)(A)

For the purpose of securing bonds issued pursuant to the State Agencies Facilities Acquisition Act of 1991, §22-3-1401 et seq., the division is authorized hereby to grant to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, on behalf of the State of Arkansas, one (1) or more leasehold interests, each of which shall be for a term not to exceed fifty (50) years from the date of the grant, in a part of the State Capitol grounds as shall be determined by the division to be a suitable site for the location of parking facilities.

(B)

Any leasehold interest granted to the Arkansas Development Finance Authority may be assigned or mortgaged from time to time by the Arkansas Development Finance Authority to secure bonds of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority for the construction, extension, renovation, or repair of parking facilities, but any assignment or mortgage shall include in each case a provision that the assignment or mortgage shall terminate upon full and final payment of the particular bonds secured thereby and the discharge of the obligations of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority or of the division related to the bonds secured thereby.

(C)

Any leasehold interest granted also may include any easements over, above, or below the State Capitol grounds for vehicular or utility access to and from the parking facilities as the division shall determine to be necessary.

(3)

In the event of a default on any bonds, the assignee of the leasehold interest securing the bonds may occupy and control the parking facilities related thereto for the term of the leasehold interest and may impose fees, charges, licenses, or rents as it may determine without obtaining the approval of any agency or instrumentality of the State of Arkansas.

(b)

All fees, charges, licenses, rents, or other income of any nature derived from the operation of the parking facilities, or provided for that purpose to the division from whatever source, are hereby specifically declared to be cash funds restricted in their use and are dedicated and shall be used solely as provided and authorized in this subchapter.

(c)(1)

Commencing on the first of the month following the first issuance of the bonds of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority pursuant to the State Agencies Facilities Acquisition Act of 1991, §22-3-1401 et seq., and for so long as any of the bonds are outstanding for the purposes authorized by this subchapter, the revenues shall not be deposited into the State Treasury and shall not be subject to legislative appropriation but, as and when received by the division, the Arkansas Development Finance Authority or a trustee or agent acting on behalf of either the division or the Arkansas Development Finance Authority, as the case may be, shall be deposited into a bank or banks selected by the division to the credit of a fund designated as the “Building Authority Division Parking Facilities Revenue Bond Fund”, with appropriate accounts therein for separate bond issues or series, where applicable.

(2)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, moneys in the fund may be pledged from time to time to secure the payment of bonds of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority issued to finance the parking facilities and may be deposited and invested by or on behalf of the division in the manner as may be directed or required by a bond resolution or trust indenture related to any bond financing of the Arkansas Development Finance Authority.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 1339, § 5; 2001, No. 736, § 2; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 51; 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 51; 2019, No. 910, § 6221.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8, § 1, provided: “Transfer of the Arkansas Building Authority to the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(a)(1)

The Arkansas Building Authority is transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration by a type 2 transfer under §25-2-105.

“(2)

For the purposes of this act, the Department of Finance and Administration shall be considered a principal department established by Acts 1971, No. 38.

“(b)

All authority, powers, duties, functions, records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, are transferred to the Department of Finance and Administration, except as specified by this act.

“(c)

All powers, duties, and functions, including rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications are transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration.

“(d)

The members of the Arkansas Building Authority Council, and their successors, shall continue to be selected in the manner and serve for the terms provided by the statutes applicable to the council except as specified in this act.

“(e)

The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make appropriate name changes in the Arkansas Code to implement this act.”

Amendments.

The 2001 amendment rewrote this section.

The 2015 amendment by Acts 2015 (1st Ex. Sess.), Nos. 7 and 8 substituted “the division” for “Arkansas Building Authority” throughout the section; substituted “The Building Authority Division of the Department of Finance and Administration” for “The Arkansas Building Authority” in (a)(1); and substituted “‘Building Authority Division Parking Facilities Revenue Bond Fund’” for “‘Arkansas Building Authority Parking Facilities Revenue Bond Fund’” in (c)(1).

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division” in (a)(1).

22-3-1506. Exceptions.

The provisions of §22-3-301 et seq., pertaining to the Capitol Zoning District Commission, §22-3-401 et seq., pertaining to the Capitol Parking Control Committee, §22-3-501 et seq., pertaining to the Capitol Arts and Grounds Commission, and §22-3-202, pertaining to the Secretary of State, or any other provision of law inconsistent with the intent of this subchapter shall not be applicable to the Building Authority Division in connection with the parking facilities contemplated by this subchapter, and no filings, consents, or approvals shall be required from any agency of the state prior to the construction, renovation, or repair of parking facilities or concerning the operations thereof.

History.

Acts 2001, No. 736, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 6222.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “of the Department of Finance and Administration” following “Building Authority Division”.

Subchapter 16

— Medal of Honor Monument

22-3-1601 — 22-3-1603. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2001, No. 783, § 1, provided:

“The following are hereby abolished: (1) The Advisory Committee on Accountability; (2) The Crowley's Ridge Trail Commission; (3) The Advisory Council to the Arkansas Natural Heritage Commission of the Department of Arkansas Heritage; (4) The Advisory Board for Director of the Arkansas High Technology Training Center; (5) The Low-Level Radioactive Waste Advisory Group; (6) The Arkansas Medal of Honor Commission; (7) The Quality Management Board; and (8) The Arkansas Task Force on Timber Land Assessment.”

Publisher's Notes.

This subchapter, concerning the Medal of Honor Monument, was repealed by Acts 2001, No. 783, § 2. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

22-3-1601. Acts 1999, No. 564, § 1.

22-3-1602. Acts 1999, No. 564, § 2.

22-3-1603. Acts 1999, No. 564, § 3.